Louisiana, session 2026, SB113.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1248.3(C) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1248.3. Applicability; multi-parish funding district
* * *
C.(1) If, by June 1, 2026, Calcasieu Parish fails to authorize a local
hospital assessment payment pursuant to the provisions of this Subpart, the
governing body of any municipality within the parish with a population of
greater than sixty thousand shall have the authority to authorize a local hospital
assessment payment. Institutional providers included in the assessment
payment shall be limited to providers within the jurisdictional boundaries of the
municipality.
(2) Solely for the purposes of compliance with this Subpart, any such
municipality shall be treated as if it were a parish. All requirements that apply
to a parish and its governing body shall equally apply to any such municipality
and its governing body.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 113 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.